Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 240

Member Management

48-240-101. Member-managed.

If the LLC has elected to be member-managed, any actions that would require the action of the board of governors shall be made by the members. Unless chapters 201-248 of this title, the articles or operating agreement require otherwise, decisions shall be made and actions taken by a majority vote of the members acting in their capacity as members present at a meeting at which a quorum is established.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, § 60.

Law Reviews.

Getting Your Fair Share: What Are the Fiduciary Duties When One Member Takes a Piece of the LLC Pie? (Richard Spore), 40 Tenn. B.J. 22 (2004).

48-240-102. Standard of member conduct in a member-managed LLC.

Fiduciary Duty of Members of Member-Managed LLC. Except as provided in the articles or operating agreement, every member of a member-managed LLC must account to the LLC for any benefit, and hold as trustee for it any profits derived by the member without the consent of the other members from any transaction connected with the formation, conduct, or liquidation of the LLC or from any use by the member of its property including, but not limited to, confidential or proprietary information of the LLC or other matters entrusted to the member as a result of such person's status as a member.

Standard of Conduct. A member of a member-managed LLC shall discharge such member's duties as a member, including all duties as a member of a committee:

In good faith;

With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances; and

In a manner the member reasonably believes to be in the best interest of the LLC.

Reliance. A member of a member-managed LLC is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One (1) or more managers or employees of the LLC whom the member reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

Legal counsel, public accountants or other persons as to matters the member reasonably believes are within the person's professional or expert competence; or

A committee of the members of which such member is not a member, if the member reasonably believes the committee merits confidence.

Good Faith Requirement. The member is not acting in good faith if the member has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise committed by subsection (c) unwarranted.

Limitation of Liability for Action. A member is not liable for any action taken as a member, or any failure to take any action, if the member performed the duties of the position as a member in compliance with this section.

Burden of Proof. A person alleging a violation of this section has the burden of proving the violation.

Modification of Standard of Conduct in Articles or Operating Agreement. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, the articles or operating agreement may define the standard of conduct in a manner to reflect the understanding of the parties provided such definition is not manifestly unreasonable under the circumstances.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, § 61.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Law Reviews.

Delaware LLCs for Tennessee Lawyers? (Richard Spore), 35 Tenn. B.J. 27 (1999).

48-240-103. Member conflicts of interest.

Conflict and Procedure When Conflict Arises. A contract or other transaction between an LLC and one (1) or more of its members, or between a member-managed LLC and an organization in or of which one (1) or more of its members are governors, directors, managers, officers, partners, fiduciaries or similar equivalent or have a material financial interest, is not voidable because the member or members or the other organizations are parties or because the member or members are present at the meeting of the members or a committee at which the contract or transaction is authorized, approved, or ratified, if:

The contract or transaction was, and the person asserting the validity of the contract or transaction sustains the burden of establishing that the contract or transaction was, fair and reasonable as to the LLC at the time it was authorized, approved, or ratified;

The material facts as to the contract or transaction and as to the member's or members' interest are fully disclosed or known to the members and, unless the articles or operating agreement requires the specific approval of subdivision (a)(2)(A) or (a)(2)(B), the contract or transaction is approved in good faith by either:

The owners of a majority of the voting power of the membership interests entitled to vote that are owned by persons other than the interested member or members; or

The owners of a majority of the financial interest of the membership interests that are owned by persons other than the interested member or members;

The material facts as to the contract or transaction and as to the member's or members' interest are fully disclosed or known to the members or a committee, and the members or committee authorizes, approves, or ratifies the contract or transaction in good faith by a majority of the membership interest entitled to vote or committee members, but the interested member or members must not be counted in determining the presence of a quorum and must not vote;

The material facts of the transaction and the member's or members' interest were disclosed or known to a committee of not less than three (3) members, none of whom had a direct or indirect interest in the transaction, and such committee authorized, approved or ratified the transaction;

The contract or transaction is a distribution described in chapter 236 of this title or a merger or sale of assets described in chapter 244 of this title; or

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, the articles or operating agreement may define the standard of conduct of the members in a manner to reflect the understanding of the parties; provided, that such definition is not manifestly unreasonable under the circumstances.

Material Financial Interest. For purposes of this section:

A member does not have a material financial interest in a resolution fixing the compensation of a manager, employee, or agent of the LLC, even though the member is also receiving compensation from the LLC; and

A member has a material financial interest in each organization in which the member, or the spouse, parents, children and spouses of children, brothers and sisters and spouses of brothers and sisters of the member, or other lineal descendants of the member, or any combination of them, has a material financial interest.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, §§ 62-64.

Law Reviews.

Delaware LLCs for Tennessee Lawyers? (Richard Spore), 35 Tenn. B.J. 27 (1999).